Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5104.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-9-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-9 entitled "Casualty
Insurance Rating" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-9-4. Considerations in making of rates — Cancellation of policy.
(a) All rates shall be made in accordance with the following provisions:
(1)(i) Due consideration shall be given to past and prospective loss experience within and
outside this state, to catastrophe hazards, if any, to a reasonable margin for underwriting profit and
contingencies, to dividends, savings, or unabsorbed premium deposits allowed or returned by
insurers to their policyholders, members, or subscribers, to past and prospective expenses both
countrywide and those specially applicable to this state, and to all other relevant factors within and
outside this state; provided, that no consideration shall be given to:
(A) Any loss or incident involving a bus driver, while in the course of the bus driver’s
employment for the Rhode Island public transit authority or private or municipal school bus
companies, in establishing or maintaining that driver’s rate respecting the operation of a personal
motor vehicle or vehicles;
(B) Any loss or incident involving a law enforcement officer, while in the course of the
law enforcement officer’s employment for the state, city, town police departments, or federal law
enforcement agency, in establishing or maintaining that driver’s rate respecting the operation of a
personal motor vehicle or vehicles; and
(C) Any loss or incident involving a commercial vehicle driver, while in the course of the

commercial vehicle driver’s employment, in establishing or maintaining that driver’s rate
respecting the operation of a personal motor vehicle(s);
(ii) It shall be the responsibility of a commercial vehicle driver to provide the commercial
vehicle driver’s insurance company with proof that the loss or incident took place in the course of
employment while operating a commercial vehicle. For the purposes of this section, a “commercial
vehicle” shall be a motor vehicle with a gross weight in excess of ten thousand pounds (10,000 lbs.)
or a motor vehicle used for public livery;
(2) The systems of expense provisions included in the rates for use by any insurer or group
of insurers may differ from those of other insurers or groups of insurers to reflect the requirements
of the operating methods of any insurer or group with respect to any kind of insurance, or with
respect to any subdivision or combination of insurance for which subdivision or combination
separate expense provisions are applicable;
(3) Risks may be grouped by classifications for the establishment of rates and minimum
premiums;
(4) Rates shall not be excessive, inadequate, or unfairly discriminatory;
(5) For any policy written, delivered, or renewed on or after January 1, 2025, in establishing
or maintaining an insured’s rate or classification respecting the operation of a personal motor
vehicle, widowed persons shall not be treated differently than persons in a marriage; and
(6) In establishing or maintaining an insured’s rate or classification respecting the operation
of a personal motor vehicle, any insured sixty-five (65) years of age or older, who meets the criteria
set forth in this section and has not had any chargeable accidents or moving violations within three
(3) years preceding the establishment of the rate of insurance or classification, shall not be penalized
solely by reason of his or her age.
(b) No insurance company shall fail to renew a private passenger automobile policy
because of a loss occurrence only, unless a chargeable loss occurrence of three thousand dollars
($3,000) or more than two (2) nonchargeable loss occurrences, involving the insured, have taken
place within the annual policy year.
(c)(1) No insurance company shall fail to renew a private passenger automobile policy
solely because the insured has attained the age of sixty-five (65) years or older;
(2) Whenever the commissioner of insurance shall have reason to believe that any
insurance company has refused to renew a private passenger automobile policy solely because the
applicant has reached the age of sixty-five (65) years or older, the commissioner shall notify the
company that it may be in violation of this section and in his or her discretion he or she may require
a hearing to determine whether or not the company has actually been engaged in the practice stated
LC000312/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

in this subsection. Any hearing held under this section shall in all respects comply with the hearing
procedure provided in the Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42;
(3) If after the hearing the commissioner shall determine that the company has engaged in
the practice of systematically failing to renew private passenger automobile policies because of the
advanced age of the insured, the commissioner shall reduce their findings to writing and shall issue
and cause to be served upon the company an order to cease and desist from engaging in those
practices. After the issuance of the cease and desist order, if the commissioner finds that the
company has continued to engage in those practices, the commissioner shall impose upon the
company a fine not to exceed the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each separate
violation.
(4) Any company aggrieved by any order or decision of the commissioner of insurance
may appeal the order and decision to the superior court of Providence in accordance with the
Administrative Procedures Act, chapter 35 of title 42.
(d) No insurance group, carrier, or company in establishing any premium surcharge or
penalty relative to a specific motor vehicle policy, shall consider any accident or any claim where
any insured covered by that policy is fifty percent (50%) or less at fault.
(e) No insurance group, carrier, or company shall assess any premium surcharge against
any insured covered by a motor vehicle policy where a property damage claim payment is less than
three thousand dollars ($3,000).
(f) No insurance group, carrier, or company shall refuse to issue motor vehicle liability
insurance, impose a surcharge, or otherwise increase the rate for a motor vehicle policy solely
because the applicant is a volunteer driver. Volunteer driver is defined as a person who provides
services without compensation to a nonprofit agency or charitable organization.
(g) An insurer issuing motor vehicle liability insurance which utilizes the zip code of where
a vehicle is garaged when calculating their policy premium may do so provided the calculation of
the zip code is segmented by the municipality where the vehicle is garaged. The provisions of this
subsection shall be effective for policies issued or renewed on or after July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000312/SUB A
========
LC000312/SUB A - Page 3 of 4